Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB663.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 177.905 is repealed, reenacted as a new section of KRS Chapter
190, and amended to read as follows:
As used in Sections 1 to 9 of this Act[KRS 177.910 to 177.950], unless the context
otherwise requires:
(1) "Road" means any county, state, federal or limited access highway or turnpike,
including bridges and bridge approaches;[.]
(2) "Automobile, vehicle, or machinery recyclers" means any place where five (5) or
more junked, wrecked or nonoperative automobiles, vehicles, machines and other
similar scrap or salvage materials, excluding inoperative farm equipment, are
deposited, parked, placed or otherwise located, or any business as defined in
subsection (3) where ten (10) or more junked, wrecked or nonoperative
automobiles, vehicles, machines and other similar scrap or salvage materials are
deposited, parked, placed or otherwise located;[.]
(3) "Business" means any person engaged as an automobile dealer, body shop operator,
wrecker service operator, service station operator or other activity which may buy,
sell or repair nonoperative vehicles, automobiles or machinery as a service;[.]
(4) "Material recyclers" means[shall mean] any establishment or place of business,
including garbage dumps and sanitary fills, maintained, operated, or used for
storing, keeping, buying or selling of old or scrap copper, brass, rope, rags,
batteries, paper, trash, rubber debris, waste, or motor vehicle parts, iron, steel, and
other old or scrap ferrous or nonferrous material;[.]
(5) "Operator or operators" means a person, firm or corporation operating an
automobile, vehicle, machinery or material recycling establishment or place of
business or the allowing of such automobile, vehicle, machinery or material
recycling establishment or place of business to be placed or deposited, or to remain
Page 1 of 7
XXXX 2/14/2025 3:51 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1548
on premises owned or controlled by such person, firm or corporation;[.]
(6) "Person" means any individual, firm, agency, company, association, partnership,
business trust, joint stock company, body politic or corporation; and[.]
(7) "Commission"["Department"] means the Motor Vehicle Commission[Department
of Highways.
(8) "Commissioner" means the commissioner of the Department of Highways].
Section 2. KRS 177.910 is repealed, reenacted as a new section of KRS Chapter
190, and amended to read as follows:
A person shall not[No person shall] operate or cause to be operated any automobile,
vehicle, machinery, or material recycling establishment or place of business which is
situated closer than one thousand (1,000) feet from the right-of-way line of any road
unless a license[permit] for the[such] operation has been[shall have been] obtained from
the commission[department]. The operation of any automobile, vehicle, machinery, or
material recycling establishment or place of business so situated without a
license[permit] is hereby declared to be a public nuisance.
Section 3. KRS 177.912 is repealed, reenacted as a new section of KRS Chapter
190, and amended to read as follows:
An automobile, vehicle, or machinery recycling establishment or place of business or
material recycling establishment or place of business which complies as a conforming use
in an industrially zoned area under the applicable zoning ordinances and regulations of
any county or city, as determined in the discretion of the commission[commissioner of
highways], shall not be deemed to be in violation of Sections 1 to 9 of this Act[KRS
177.905 to 177.950].
Section 4. KRS 177.915 is repealed, reenacted as a new section of KRS Chapter
190, and amended to read as follows:
(1) The commission shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with
KRS Chapter 13A to establish that the license required under Section 2 of this
Page 2 of 7
XXXX 2/14/2025 3:51 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1548
Act shall be issued[The permit required by KRS 177.910 shall be issued in
accordance with the administrative regulations of the department, promulgated
pursuant to the provisions of KRS 177.905 to 177.950,] when it is shown to the
satisfaction of the commission[commissioner] that an automobile, vehicle,
machinery, or material recycling establishment or place of business located closer
than 1,000 feet from the right-of-way line of any road is, so far as deemed practical
by the commission[secretary], hidden from the view of motorists using the[such]
road by an artificial or natural screen, or is hidden by virtue of natural topography
[so hidden].
(2) The screening required in this section may be effected by the construction of a
fence, or by planting shrubs, trees, or flowering plants, the foliage of which shall,
immediately upon planting, provide a sufficient screen or by making use of foliage
already in existence.
(3) Any automobile, vehicle, machinery, or material recycling establishment or place of
business that cannot as a practical matter be screened[,] shall be required to be
removed.
Section 5. KRS 177.920 is repealed, reenacted as a new section of KRS Chapter
190, and amended to read as follows:
The commission[commissioner] is hereby directed to charge a fee of five-hundred
dollars ($500)[fifty dollars ($50)] for the issuance of a license required under Section 2
of this Act[permit required by KRS 177.915]. The license shall be effective for one (1)
calendar year[Such permit shall be effective for a two (2) year period beginning July 1,
1962, through June 30, 1964, and each two (2) year period thereafter]. Proceeds from
the[such] fees shall be paid to the State Treasurer and hereby are appropriated to the
commission pursuant to KRS 190.058(10)[state road fund].
Section 6. KRS 177.925 is repealed, reenacted as a new section of KRS Chapter
190, and amended to read as follows:
Page 3 of 7
XXXX 2/14/2025 3:51 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1548
Where the commission[commissioner] has reasonable cause to doubt the financial
responsibility of the operator or compliance by the operator with the provisions of
Sections 1 to 9 of this Act[KRS 177.905 to 177.950], the commission[commissioner]
may require the[such] operator to furnish and maintain a bond in the[such] form, amount,
and with the[such] sureties as it[he] shall approve, but not less than one thousand dollars
($1,000) nor more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) conditioned upon the operator
complying with the provisions of Sections 1 to 9 of this Act[KRS 177.905 to 177.950]
and the regulations adopted pursuant thereto. Any bond forfeiture is hereby appropriated
to the commission[state road fund].
Section 7. KRS 177.935 is repealed, reenacted as a new section of KRS Chapter
190, and amended to read as follows:
The commission[department] is hereby empowered to:
(1) Exercise general supervision of the administration and enforcement of Sections 1 to
9 of this Act;[KRS 177.905 to 177.950.]
(2) Promulgate[, pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A,] administrative regulations in
accordance with KRS Chapter 13A pertaining to the operation of automobile,
vehicle, machinery, or material recycling establishments or places of business as the
commissioner may deem necessary to the administration and enforcement of
Sections 1 to 9 of this Act;[KRS 177.905 to 177.950.]
(3) Promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A with
respect to the sufficiency, type of material or foliage, height, density, and size of
screening required by Section 4 of this Act[KRS 177.915] to ensure[insure] the
accomplishment of the purposes of Sections 1 to 9 of this Act;[KRS 177.905 to
177.950.]
(4) Promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A with
respect to the procedural aspects of hearings conducted in accordance with[,
supplemental to] KRS Chapter 13B, the filing of reports and orders, the issuance of
Page 4 of 7
XXXX 2/14/2025 3:51 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1548
licenses[permits] and other matters;[.]
(5) Issue, after hearing, final orders abating the operation of an automobile, vehicle,
machinery, or material recycling establishments or places of business in violation of
the provisions of Sections 1 to 9 of this Act[KRS 177.905 to 177.950], or requiring
the adoption of remedial measures including the construction or planting of screens
or the utilization of natural screening, extension, modification, or addition to new or
existing screens;[.]
(6) Issue, continue in effect, revoke, modify, or deny under conditions as the
commission[department] may prescribe and subject to a hearing in accordance with
KRS Chapter 13B, licenses[permits] for the operation of an automobile, vehicle,
machinery, or material recycling establishments or places of business;[.]
(7) Make investigations or inspections which may be deemed necessary by the
commission[commissioner] to ensure[insure] compliance with the provisions of
Sections 1 to 9 of this Act[KRS 177.905 to 177.950], or with any administrative
regulations or orders of the department which may be deemed necessary to enable
the commission[department] to administer and enforce the provisions of Sections 1
to 9 of this Act;[KRS 177.905 to 177.950.]
(8) Institute in a court of competent jurisdiction procedures, including injunctive relief,
to compel compliance with the provisions of Sections 1 to 9 of this Act[KRS
177.905 to 177.950] and with the final orders and administrative regulations issued
pursuant thereto;[.]
(9) Enter at any reasonable time through any officer, assistant, agent, or employee in or
upon any public or private property for the purpose of investigation and inspection
of conditions relating to the operation of any automobile, vehicle, machinery, or
material recycling establishments or places of business; and[.]
(10) Perform any other acts as may be necessary, proper, or desirable in order to carry
out effectively the duties and responsibilities of the commission[department]
Page 5 of 7
XXXX 2/14/2025 3:51 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1548
prescribed in Sections 1 to 9 of this Act KRS 177.905 to 177.950.
Section 8. KRS 177.940 is repealed, reenacted as a new section of KRS Chapter
190, and amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) Public hearings shall be conducted in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A by
the commission[department] prior to the promulgation of any administrative
regulations which pertain to the prevention, abatement, or control of
automobile, vehicle, machinery, or material recycling establishments or places
of business.
(b) Administrative hearings shall be conducted in accordance with KRS Chapter
13B before the issuance of any final order prohibiting the performance by any
person of any act or acts deemed to be in contravention of any administrative
regulations, orders, or licenses[permits] of the department; or before denial,
revocation, or modification of any license[permit] provided for by Sections 1
to 9 of this Act[KRS 177.905 to 177.950]; or before any other final
determination is made by the department which directly affects the activities
of any person.
(2) The commission[department] shall grant an administrative hearing to any person,
not previously heard in connection with the issuance of any order or the making of
any determination, who may consider himself or herself aggrieved by any order or
determination and who shall file with the department a verified petition alleging
that the order or determination is contrary to law or that is injurious to him or her,
stating the grounds and reasons therefor and requesting a hearing thereon. The
hearing shall be conducted in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B.
Section 9. KRS 177.950 is repealed and reenacted as a new section of KRS
Chapter 190 to read as follows:
Any aggrieved party may appeal the final order of the department following the hearing
to the Circuit Court of the county in which the alleged offense occurred in accordance
Page 6 of 7
XXXX 2/14/2025 3:51 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1548
with KRS Chapter 13B.
Page 7 of 7
XXXX 2/14/2025 3:51 PM Jacketed